Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-8,110
Repealed. Laws 2018, LB377, § 87. Operative date January 1, 2019. Class I school district; teachers; periodic report required; contents.

Every teacher in a Class I school district shall make a report at the end of each nine-week period, to the secretary of the district, of the number of pupils attending the teacher's school, the names and ages of each, the days attended, and the studies pursued. No teacher will be entitled to receive pay in full for a term's service until the term summary is properly filled out and approved by the secretary.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision IX, § 2, p. 365;

R.S.1913, § 6871;

C.S.1929, § 6439;

C.S.1929, § 79-1402;

R.S.1943, § 79-1401;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 229, p. 766;

Laws 1975, LB 493, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-602;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 535.